Montana, session 2025, LC0461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 15-65-121, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-65-121. (Temporary) Distribution of tax proceeds. (1) The proceeds of the tax imposed by 15-
65-111 must, in accordance with the provisions of 17-2-124, be deposited in an account in the state special
revenue fund to the credit of the department. The department may spend from that account in accordance with
an expenditure appropriation by the legislature based on an estimate of the costs of collecting and disbursing
the proceeds of the tax. Before allocating the balance of the tax proceeds in accordance with the provisions of
17-2-124 and as provided in subsections (2)(a) through (2)(j) of this section, the department shall determine the
expenditures by state agencies for in-state lodging for each reporting period and deduct 4% of that amount from
the tax proceeds received each reporting period. The department shall distribute the portion of the 4% that was
paid with federal funds to the department of administration for return to the federal government and deposit
30% of the amount deducted less the portion paid with federal funds in the state general fund.
(2) The balance of the tax proceeds received each reporting period and not deducted pursuant to
the expenditure appropriation, deposited in the state general fund, distributed to agencies that paid the tax with
federal funds, or deposited in the heritage preservation and development account must be transferred to an
account in the state special revenue fund to the credit of the department of commerce for the purposes
designated under 90-1-122, to the emergency lodging for victims of domestic violence or human trafficking
account, to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account, to the Montana historical
society, to the university system, to the state-tribal economic development commission, and to the department
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0461.1
of fish, wildlife, and parks, as follows:
(a) 1% to the Montana historical society to be used for the installation or maintenance of roadside
historical signs and historic sites;
(b) 2.5% to the university system for the establishment and maintenance of a Montana travel
research program;
(c) 6.5% to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks for the maintenance of facilities in state parks
that have both resident and nonresident use;
(d) 1.4% to the invasive species state special revenue account established in 80-7-1004;
(e) 60.2% to be used directly by to the department of commerce: as provided in 90-1-122[, and in
part to renovate the Miles City train depot]
(i) 28.6% to the state special revenue account for tourism media, made-in-Montana promotions
and main street programs, wayfinding and signage, and support to trade offices;
(ii) 14.3% to the state special revenue account for rural tourism, under-visited area attraction
projects, and tribal tourism, including infrastructure, tourism-related emergency services, marketing, and
promotional activities;
(iii) 15.3% to the state special revenue account for tourism grant programs;
(iv) 1% to the state special revenue account for regional tourism assistance; and
(v) 1% to the state special revenue account for use in collaboration with the office of economic
development established in 2-15-218 for new tourism attractions and other state business development
programs;
(f) 0.1% to the emergency lodging for victims of domestic violence or human trafficking account
established in 44-4-1506;
(g) (i) except as provided in subsection (2)(g)(ii), 22.5% to be distributed by the department of
revenue to regional nonprofit tourism corporations in the ratio of the proceeds collected in each tourism region
to the total proceeds collected statewide; and
(ii) if 22.5% of the proceeds collected annually within the limits of a city, consolidated city-county,
resort area, or resort area district exceeds $35,000, 50% of the amount available for distribution to the regional
nonprofit tourism corporation in the region where the city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0461.1
district is located, to be distributed by the department of revenue to the nonprofit convention and visitors bureau
in that city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area district;
(h) 0.5% to the state special revenue account provided for in 90-1-135 for use by the state-tribal
economic development commission established in 90-1-131 for activities in the Indian tourism region;
(i) 2.6% to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account established in 22-3-
115; and
(j) 2.7% or $1 million, whichever is less, to the Montana heritage preservation and development
account provided for in 22-3-1004. The Montana heritage preservation and development commission shall
report on the use of funds received pursuant to this subsection (2)(j) to the legislative finance committee on a
semiannual basis, in accordance with 5-11-210.
(3) If a city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area district qualifies under 15-68-
820(5)(b)(iii) or this section for funds but fails to either recognize a nonprofit convention and visitors bureau or
submit and gain approval for an annual marketing plan as required in 15-65-122, then those funds must be
allocated to the regional nonprofit tourism corporation in the region in which the city, consolidated city-county,
resort area, or resort area district is located.
(4) If a regional nonprofit tourism corporation fails to submit and gain approval for an annual
marketing plan as required in 15-65-122, then those funds otherwise allocated to the regional nonprofit tourism
corporation may be used by the department of commerce for tourism promotion and promotion of the state as a
location for the production of motion pictures and television commercials.
(5) The tax proceeds received that are transferred to a state special revenue account pursuant to
subsections (2)(a) through (2)(c), (2)(e), and (2)(g) are statutorily appropriated to the entities as provided in 17-
7-502. The tax proceeds received that are transferred to the emergency lodging for victims of domestic violence
or human trafficking account pursuant to subsection (2)(f) are subject to the appropriation provisions in 44-4-
1506.
(6) The tax proceeds received that are transferred to the invasive species state special revenue
account pursuant to subsection (2)(d), to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account
pursuant to subsection (2)(i), and to the Montana heritage preservation and development account pursuant to
subsection (2)(j) are subject to appropriation by the legislature. (Terminates June 30, 2027--sec. 12, Ch. 563, L.
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0461.1
2021; sec. 10, Ch. 758, L. 2023; bracketed language in subsection (1)(e) terminates June 30, 2025--sec. 34,
Ch. 763, L. 2023.)
15-65-121. (Effective July 1, 2027) Distribution of tax proceeds. (1) The proceeds of the tax
imposed by 15-65-111 must, in accordance with the provisions of 17-2-124, be deposited in an account in the
state special revenue fund to the credit of the department. The department may spend from that account in
accordance with an expenditure appropriation by the legislature based on an estimate of the costs of collecting
and disbursing the proceeds of the tax. Before allocating the balance of the tax proceeds in accordance with
the provisions of 17-2-124 and as provided in subsections (2)(a) through (2)(h) of this section, the department
shall determine the expenditures by state agencies for in-state lodging for each reporting period and deduct 4%
of that amount from the tax proceeds received each reporting period. The department shall distribute the
portion of the 4% that was paid with federal funds to the department of administration for return to the federal
government and deposit 30% of the amount deducted less the portion paid with federal funds in the state
general fund. The amount of $400,000 each year must be deposited in the Montana heritage preservation and
development account provided for in 22-3-1004.
(2) The balance of the tax proceeds received each reporting period and not deducted pursuant to
the expenditure appropriation, deposited in the state general fund, distributed to agencies that paid the tax with
federal funds, or deposited in the heritage preservation and development account must be transferred to an
account in the state special revenue fund to the credit of the department of commerce for the purposes
designated under 90-1-122, to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account, to the
Montana historical society, to the university system, to the state-tribal economic development commission, and
to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks, as follows:
(a) 1% to the Montana historical society to be used for the installation or maintenance of roadside
historical signs and historic sites;
(b) 2.5% to the university system for the establishment and maintenance of a Montana travel
research program;
(c) 6.5% to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks for the maintenance of facilities in state parks
that have both resident and nonresident use;
(d) 1.4% to the invasive species state special revenue account established in 80-7-1004;
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0461.1
(e) 63% to be used directly by to the department of commerce: as provided in 90-1-122
(i) 30% to the state special revenue account for tourism media, made-in-Montana promotions and
main street programs, wayfinding and signage, and support to trade offices;
(ii) 15% to the state special revenue account for rural tourism, under-visited area attraction
projects, and tribal tourism, including infrastructure, tourism-related emergency services, marketing, and
promotional activities;
(iii) 16% to the state special revenue account for tourism grant programs;
(iv) 1% to the state special revenue account for regional tourism assistance; and
(v) 1% to the state special revenue account for use in collaboration with the office of economic
development established in 2-15-218 for new tourism attractions and other state business development
programs;
(f) (i) except as provided in subsection (2)(f)(ii), 22.5% to be distributed by the department of
revenue to regional nonprofit tourism corporations in the ratio of the proceeds collected in each tourism region
to the total proceeds collected statewide; and
(ii) if 22.5% of the proceeds collected annually within the limits of a city, consolidated city-county,
resort area, or resort area district exceeds $35,000, 50% of the amount available for distribution to the regional
nonprofit tourism corporation in the region where the city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area
district is located, to be distributed by the department of revenue to the nonprofit convention and visitors bureau
in that city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area district;
(g) 0.5% to the state special revenue account provided for in 90-1-135 for use by the state-tribal
economic development commission established in 90-1-131 for activities in the Indian tourism region; and
(h) 2.6% to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account established in 22-3-
115.
(3) If a city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area district qualifies under 15-68-
820(5)(b)(iii) or this section for funds but fails to either recognize a nonprofit convention and visitors bureau or
submit and gain approval for an annual marketing plan as required in 15-65-122, then those funds must be
allocated to the regional nonprofit tourism corporation in the region in which the city, consolidated city-county,
resort area, or resort area district is located.
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0461.1
(4) If a regional nonprofit tourism corporation fails to submit and gain approval for an annual
marketing plan as required in 15-65-122, then those funds otherwise allocated to the regional nonprofit tourism
corporation may be used by the department of commerce for tourism promotion and promotion of the state as a
location for the production of motion pictures and television commercials.
(5) The tax proceeds received that are transferred to a state special revenue account pursuant to
subsections (2)(a) through (2)(c), (2)(e), and (2)(f) are statutorily appropriated to the entities as provided in 17-
7-502.
(6) The tax proceeds received that are transferred to the invasive species state special revenue
account pursuant to subsection (2)(d) and to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account
pursuant to subsection (2)(h) are subject to appropriation by the legislature."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Repealer. The following section of the Montana Code Annotated is
repealed:
90-1-122. Lodging facility use tax allocation -- allowable uses -- unspent fund redistribution -- rulemaking -
- fees.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – ****